en: Movement mechanism: Convertible; Glider; Rocker; Swing; Other
es: Mecanismo de movimiento: Convertible; Deslizador; Mecedora; Columpio; Otro
th: กลไกการเคลื่อนไหว: ปรับเปลี่ยนได้; เลื่อนไปมา (Glider); โยก (Rocker); แกว่ง (Swing); อื่นๆ
el: Μηχανισμός κίνησης: Μετατρέψιμος; Μηχανισμός ολίσθησης (glider); Μηχανισμός λίκνισης (rocker); Μηχανισμός κούνιας; Άλλο
fr: Mécanisme de mouvement: Convertible; Glissant; À bascule; À balancier; Autre
zh-CN: 运动机制: 可转换式; 滑翔式; 摇摆式; 秋千式; 其他
hr-HR: Mehanizam kretanja: Sklopivo; Klizno; Njihaljka; Ljuljačka; Ostalo
hu: Mozgásmechanizmus: Átalakítható; Csúszó; Hintázó; Hinta; Egyéb
ro-RO: Mecanismul de mișcare: Convertibil; Glisor; Balansoar; Leagăn; Altele
ru: Механизм движения: Трансформер; Глайдер; Качалка; Качели; Другое
cs: Pohybový mechanismus: Konvertibilní; Kluzné houpání; Houpání; Houpání (swing); Jiné
ko: 유동 메커니즘: 컨버터블; 글라이더; 락커; 스윙; 기타
it: Meccanismo di movimento: Convertibile; A slitta; A dondolo; Ad altalena; Altro
zh-TW: 活動機構: 可轉換; 滑翔式; 搖桿式; 鞦韆式; 其他
tr: Hareket mekanizması: Dönüştürülebilir; Kayar sistem; Sallanan; Salıncak; Diğer
lt-LT: Judėjimo mechanizmas: Konvertuojamas; Slystamasis; Supamasis; Švytuoklinis; Kita
pt-PT: Mecanismo de movimento: Conversível; Deslizante; De baloiço; De balanço; Outro
ja: 動作メカニズム: コンバーチブル; グライダー; ロッカー; スイング; その他
vi: Cơ chế chuyển động: Có thể chuyển đổi; Trượt; Bập bênh; Xích đu; Khác
sk-SK: Pohybový mechanizmus: Konvertibilný; Klzné; Hojdacie; Závesné hojdacie; Iné
da: Bevægelsesmekanisme: Konverterbar; Glidefunktion; Gyngefunktion; Svingfunktion; Andet
bg-BG: Механизъм на движение: Конвертируем; Плъзгащ се; Люлеещ се; С люлка; Друго
fi: Liikemekanismi: Muunnettava; Liukuva; Keinuvipu; Keinu; Muu
sv: Rörelsemekanism: Konvertibel; Glidare; Gungstol; Gunga; Övrigt
nb: Bevegelsesmekanisme: Konverterbar; Glider; Gynge; Huske; Annet
nl: Bewegingsmechanisme: Converteerbaar; Schommelstoel; Schommel; Swing; Overig
pt-BR: Mecanismo de movimento: Conversível; Deslizante; Balanço; Balanço suspenso; Outros
pl: Mechanizm ruchu: Rozkładany / Konwertowalny; Z systemem wahadłowym; Bujany; Huśtający; Inne
sl-SI: Mehanizem premikanja: Prilagodljivo; Glider (drsno guganje); Gugalnik; Gugalnica; Drugo
de: Bewegungsmechanismus: Verwandelbar; Gleiter; Wippe; Schaukel; Sonstige